Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Tax Liability

§ 21-1-61.
Tax liability in case of creation or enlargement of municipality.

In all cases where a municipality is created or the limits of an existing municipality are enlarged under the provisions of this chapter, the property included within the municipal boundaries by such creation or enlargement shall become liable for and subject to municipal ad valorem taxation on the tax lien date next succeeding the effective date of the decree creating or enlarging such municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-27; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 27, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-1-63.
Tax liability in case of contraction of municipality.

Whenever any territory of an existing municipality is excluded therefrom by a contraction of the boundaries thereof under the provisions of this chapter, and there shall be at such time outstanding bonds or other indebtedness of such municipality constituting a lien on the territory so excluded, and which indebtedness was incurred while such territory was a part of such municipality, such territory shall remain liable for its pro rata share of said indebtedness, and the governing authorities of such municipality shall have power and authority to assess the property in such territory so excluded for taxation and to levy a tax thereon for the payment of said indebtedness in the same manner and to the same extent as the property within such municipality is taxed for the payment of such indebtedness.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-28; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 28, eff from and after July 1, 1950.